Ohio, session 136, SB77.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF OHIO:
Section 1. That section 4112.041 of the Revised Code be 5
enacted to read as follows: 6
Sec. 4112.041. The Ohio civil rights commission shall 7
establish and maintain a system for an individual to report 8
discrimination in the payment of wages by an employer in 9
violation of division (A) of section 4112.02 of the Revised 10
Code. The system shall allow an individual to make an anonymous 11
complaint through a toll-free telephone number or the web site 12
maintained by the commission. The commission shall review all 13
complaints received through this system in a timely manner. 14